test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_hadde_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - hadde: # ok HADDE
    hadde+N+Sg+Nom:  hadde
    hadde+N+Sg+Gen:  haˊde
    hadde+N+Sg+Acc:  haˊde
    hadde+N+Sg+Ill:  haadan
    hadde+N+Sg+Loc:  haddeest
    hadde+N+Sg+Com:  hoddijn
    hadde+N+Sg+Abe:  haˊdettáá
    hadde+N+Ess:  hadden
    hadde+N+Par:  hadded
    hadde+N+Pl+Nom:  haˊdeh
    hadde+N+Pl+Gen:  [hoodij, hoˊdij]
    hadde+N+Pl+Acc:  hoodijd
    hadde+N+Pl+Ill:  [hoodijd, hoddijd]
    hadde+N+Pl+Loc:  hoodijn
    hadde+N+Pl+Com:  hoˊdijguin
    hadde+N+Pl+Abe:  hoˊdijttáá

  Noun - sappe: # ok HADDE
    sappe+N+Sg+Nom:  sappe
    sappe+N+Sg+Gen:  saˊpe
    sappe+N+Sg+Acc:  saˊpe
    sappe+N+Sg+Ill:  saapan
    sappe+N+Sg+Loc:  sappeest
    sappe+N+Sg+Com:  soppijn
    sappe+N+Sg+Abe:  saˊpettáá
    sappe+N+Ess:  sappen
    sappe+N+Par:  sapped
    sappe+N+Pl+Nom:  saˊpeh
    sappe+N+Pl+Gen:  [soopij, soˊpij]
    sappe+N+Pl+Acc:  soopijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Ill:  soppijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Loc:  soopijn
    sappe+N+Pl+Com:  soˊpijguin
    sappe+N+Pl+Abe:  soˊpijttáá

  Noun - litte: # ok HADDE
    litte+N+Sg+Nom:  litte
    litte+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊte
    litte+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊte
    litte+N+Sg+Ill:  liitán
    litte+N+Sg+Loc:  litteest
    litte+N+Sg+Com:  littijn
    litte+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊtettáá
    litte+N+Ess:  litten
    litte+N+Par:  litted
    litte+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊteh
    litte+N+Pl+Gen:  [liitij, liˊtij]
    litte+N+Pl+Acc:  liitijd
    litte+N+Pl+Ill:  littijd # MM
    litte+N+Pl+Loc:  liitijn
    litte+N+Pl+Com:  liˊtijguin
    litte+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊtijttáá

  Noun - lodde: # ok HADDE
    lodde+N+Sg+Nom:  lodde
    lodde+N+Sg+Gen:  loˊde
    lodde+N+Sg+Acc:  loˊde
    lodde+N+Sg+Ill:  loodán
    lodde+N+Sg+Loc:  loddeest
    lodde+N+Sg+Com:  luddijn
    lodde+N+Sg+Abe:  loˊdettáá
    lodde+N+Ess:  lodden
    lodde+N+Par:  lodded
    lodde+N+Pl+Nom:  loˊdeh
    lodde+N+Pl+Gen:  [luudij, luˊdij]
    lodde+N+Pl+Acc:  luudijd
    lodde+N+Pl+Ill:  [luudijd, luddijd]
    lodde+N+Pl+Loc:  luudijn
    lodde+N+Pl+Com:  luˊdijguin
    lodde+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊdijttáá

  Noun - lanne: # ok HADDE
    lanne+N+Sg+Nom:  lanne
    lanne+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊṇe
    lanne+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊṇe
    lanne+N+Sg+Ill:  laaṇan
    lanne+N+Sg+Loc:  lanneest
    lanne+N+Sg+Com:  lonnijn
    lanne+N+Sg+Abe:  laṇettáá
    lanne+N+Ess:  lannen
    lanne+N+Par:  lanned
    lanne+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊṇeh
    lanne+N+Pl+Gen:  [looṇij, loˊṇij]
    lanne+N+Pl+Acc:  looṇijd
    lanne+N+Pl+Ill:  [looṇijd, lonnijd]
    lanne+N+Pl+Loc:  looṇijn
    lanne+N+Pl+Com:  loˊṇijguin
    lanne+N+Pl+Abe:  loˊṇijttáá

  Noun - ponne: # ok HADDE
    ponne+N+Sg+Nom:  ponne
    ponne+N+Sg+Gen:  poˊṇe
    ponne+N+Sg+Acc:  poˊṇe
    ponne+N+Sg+Ill:  pooṇán
    ponne+N+Sg+Loc:  ponneest
    ponne+N+Sg+Com:  punnijn
    ponne+N+Sg+Abe:  poˊṇettáá
    ponne+N+Ess:  ponnen
    ponne+N+Par:  ponnen
    ponne+N+Pl+Nom:  poˊṇeh
    ponne+N+Pl+Gen:  [puuṇij, puˊṇij]
    ponne+N+Pl+Acc:  puuṇijd
    ponne+N+Pl+Ill:  [puuṇijd, punnijd]
    ponne+N+Pl+Loc:  puuṇijn
    ponne+N+Pl+Com:  puˊṇijguin
    ponne+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊṇijttáá

  Noun - runne: # ok HADDE
    runne+N+Sg+Nom:  runne
    runne+N+Sg+Gen:  ruˊṇe
    runne+N+Sg+Acc:  ruˊṇe
    runne+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuṇán
    runne+N+Sg+Loc:  runneest
    runne+N+Sg+Com:  runnijn
    runne+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊṇettáá
    runne+N+Ess:  runnen
    runne+N+Par:  runned
    runne+N+Pl+Nom:  ruˊṇeh
    runne+N+Pl+Gen:  [ruuṇij, ruˊṇij]
    runne+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuṇijd
    runne+N+Pl+Ill:  runnijd
    runne+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuṇijn
    runne+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊṇijguin
    runne+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊṇijttáá

  Noun - cumme: # ok HADDE
    cumme+N+Sg+Nom:  cumme
    cumme+N+Sg+Gen:  cuˊṃe
    cumme+N+Sg+Acc:  cuˊṃe
    cumme+N+Sg+Ill:  cuuṃán
    cumme+N+Sg+Loc:  cummeest
    cumme+N+Sg+Com:  cummijn
    cumme+N+Sg+Abe:  cuˊṃettáá
    cumme+N+Ess:  cummen
    cumme+N+Par:  cummed
    cumme+N+Pl+Nom:  cuˊṃeh
    cumme+N+Pl+Gen:  [cuuṃij, cuˊṃij]
    cumme+N+Pl+Acc:  cuuṃijd
    cumme+N+Pl+Ill:  [cuuṃijd, cummijd]
    cumme+N+Pl+Loc:  cuuṃijn
    cumme+N+Pl+Com:  cuˊṃijguin
    cumme+N+Pl+Abe:  cuˊṃijttáá

  Noun - pille: # ok HADDE
    pille+N+Sg+Nom:  pille
    pille+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊḷe
    pille+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊḷe
    pille+N+Sg+Ill:  piiḷán
    pille+N+Sg+Loc:  pilleest
    pille+N+Sg+Com:  pillijn
    pille+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊḷettáá
    pille+N+Ess:  pillen
    pille+N+Par: pilled
    pille+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊḷeh
    pille+N+Pl+Gen:  [piiḷij, piˊḷij]
    pille+N+Pl+Acc:  piiḷijd
    pille+N+Pl+Ill:  [piiḷijd, pillijd]
    pille+N+Pl+Loc:  piiḷijn
    pille+N+Pl+Com:  piˊḷijguin
    pille+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊḷijttáá

  Noun - nartte: # ok HADDE
    nartte+N+Sg+Nom:  nartte
    nartte+N+Sg+Gen:  naˊrte
    nartte+N+Sg+Acc:  naˊrte
    nartte+N+Sg+Ill:  naartan
    nartte+N+Sg+Loc:  nartteest
    nartte+N+Sg+Com:  norttijn
    nartte+N+Sg+Abe:  naˊrtettáá
    nartte+N+Ess:  nartten
    nartte+N+Par:  nartted
    nartte+N+Pl+Nom:  naˊrteh
    nartte+N+Pl+Gen:  [noortij, noˊrtij]
    nartte+N+Pl+Acc:  noortijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Ill:  norttijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Loc:  noortijn
    nartte+N+Pl+Com:  nortijguin
    nartte+N+Pl+Abe:  noˊrtijttáá

  Noun - luŋkke: # ok HADDE
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Nom:  luŋkke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Gen:  luˊŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Acc:  luˊŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Ill:  luuŋkán
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Loc:  luŋkkeest
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Com:  luŋkkijn
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Abe:  luˊŋkettáá
    luŋkke+N+Ess:  luŋkken
    luŋkke+N+Par:  luŋkked
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Nom:  luˊŋkeh
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Gen:  [luuŋkij, luˊŋkij]
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Acc:  luuŋkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Ill:  luŋkkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Loc:  luuŋkijn
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Com:  luˊŋkijguin
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊŋkijttáá

  Noun - puicce: # ok HADDE
    puicce+N+Sg+Nom:  puicce
    puicce+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊice
    puicce+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊice
    puicce+N+Sg+Ill:  puuicán
    puicce+N+Sg+Loc:  puicceest
    puicce+N+Sg+Com:  puiccijn
    puicce+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊicettáá
    puicce+N+Ess:  puiccen
    puicce+N+Par:  puiccen
    puicce+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊiceh
    puicce+N+Pl+Gen:  [puuicij, puˊicij]
    puicce+N+Pl+Acc:  puuicijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Ill:  puiccijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Loc:  puuicijn
    puicce+N+Pl+Com:  puˊicijguin
    puicce+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊicijttáá

  Noun - tigge: # ok HADDE
    tigge+N+Sg+Nom: tigge
    tigge+N+Sg+Gen: tiˊge
    tigge+N+Sg+Acc: tiˊge
    tigge+N+Sg+Ill: tiigán
    tigge+N+Sg+Loc: tiggeest
    tigge+N+Sg+Com: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Sg+Abe: tiˊgettáá
    tigge+N+Ess: tiggen
    tigge+N+Par: tigged
    tigge+N+Pl+Nom: tiˊgeh
    tigge+N+Pl+Gen: [tiigij, tiˊgij]
    tigge+N+Pl+Acc: tiigijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Ill: tiggijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Loc: tiigijn
    tigge+N+Pl+Com: tiˊgijguin
    tigge+N+Pl+Abe: tiˊgijttáá
